Maine, session 132, LD296.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION, DEPARTMENT OF
Lake Water Quality Restoration and Protection Fund Z385
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for projects that meet specific criteria and improve or
maintain the quality of lake waters in the State.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $50,000 $50,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $50,000 $50,000
Page 1 - 132LR0653(06)